Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 3. Carbon Sequestration.

Secs. 44.37.200 — 44.37.220.
Carbon sequestration studies and recommendations; assessment by the commissioner; definitions. [Repealed, § 3 ch 152 SLA 2004.]

Revisor’s notes. —

These sections were enacted conditionally under sec. 6,
ch. 152, SLA 2004. The condition was never satisfied and therefore the sections never took effect.